District of Columbia statutes.
31-232

Aiding or assisting unauthorized activity.

No person shall aid or assist another person in unauthorized activity proscribed by § 31-231, including selling, soliciting, or negotiating for applications, policies, memberships, or other business.

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-232, § 103, 54 DCR 368